Utah statutes.
41-6a-1616.   High intensity beams -- Red or blue lights -- Flashing lights -- Color of rear lights and reflectors.

(1) (a)  Except as provided under Subsection (1)(b), under the conditions specified under Subsection 41-6a-1603(1)(a), a lighted lamp or illuminating device on a vehicle, which projects a beam of light of an intensity greater than 300 candlepower shall be directed so that no part of the high intensity portion of the beam will strike the level of the roadway on which the vehicle stands at a distance of more than 75 feet from the vehicle.

(b)  The provisions of Subsection (1)(a) do not apply to head lamps, spot lamps, auxiliary lamps, flashing turn signals, hazard warning lamps, and school bus warning lamps.

(c)  A motor vehicle on a highway may not have more than a total of four lamps lighted on the front of the vehicle including head lamps, auxiliary lamps, spot lamps, or any other lamp if the lamp projects a beam of an intensity greater than 300 candlepower.

(2) (a)  Except for an authorized emergency vehicle and a school bus, a person may not operate or move any vehicle or equipment on a highway with a lamp or device capable of displaying a red light that is visible from directly in front of the center of the vehicle.

(b)  Except for a law enforcement vehicle, a person may not operate or move any vehicle or equipment on a highway with a lamp or device capable of displaying a blue light that is visible from directly in front of the center of the vehicle.

(3)  A person may not use flashing lights on a vehicle except for:

(a)  taillights of bicycles under Section 41-6a-1114;

(b)  authorized emergency vehicles under rules made by the department under Section 41-6a-1601;

(c)  turn signals under Section 41-6a-1604;

(d)  hazard warning lights under Sections 41-6a-1608 and 41-6a-1611;

(e)  school bus flashing lights under Section 41-6a-1302; and

(f)  vehicles engaged in highway construction or maintenance under Section 41-6a-1617.

(4)  A person may not use a rotating light on any vehicle other than an authorized emergency vehicle.

